Hawaii statutes.
[§291-58] Requirement to provide parking for persons
with disabilities; penalty. Beginning July 1, 2002, any public or private
entity that provides a parking space reserved for persons with disabilities
shall comply with this part and any administrative rules adopted under this
part. A private entity that fails to comply with this section shall be fined
not less than $250 nor more than $500 for each separate offense. Each day of
violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any action taken to impose or
collect any penalty provided for in this section shall be considered a civil
action. [L 2001, c 297, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next